Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-877
Student teacher or intern; responsibilities and duties.

A cooperating teacher, in cooperation with the principal or other administrator and the representative of the teacher preparation institution, shall assign to the student teacher or intern responsibilities and duties that will provide adequate preparation for teaching.

Laws 1971, LB 175, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1299;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 502.